Wyoming statutes. Title 12 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 4 Local Licenses

Law reviews. —

For article, “No Home On the Range For Home Rule,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 791 (1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Effect of state regulation of liquor sales on municipal power to impose occupation license or tax for revenue, 6 ALR2d 737.

What constitutes “sale” of liquor in violation of statute or ordinance, 89 ALR3d 551.